Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 7. 2012 Large Project Funding [Repealed]

§ 9-15-701.
Munn Place conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 62, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-702.
Devils Tower conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 62, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-703.
North Cottonwood conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 62, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-704.
Luman Ranch conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 62, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-705.
Johnson sections conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 62, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-706.
Diamond G conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 62, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-707.
Wunder Ranch conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 62, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-708.
Richie Ranch conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 62, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-709.
Mooncrest/MC Ranch conservation easements. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 62, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-710.
Weber Ranch conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 62, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-711.
Double A Ranch conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 62, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-712.
Three Bar X Ranch conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 62, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.